Louisiana, session 2026, SB96.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; "Fallen Heroes"
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
shall establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the
"Fallen Heroes" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants
for the plates. The license plate shall be restricted to use on passenger cars,
pickup trucks, recreational vehicles, motorcycles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create the special prestige license plate when the applicable
statutory provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and title
registration system is updated to accommodate the creation of new plates.
B. Provided the design is in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3), the
design shall include the words "Fallen Heroes".
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to
any citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license
plate.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five
dollars that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section.
This fee shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 96 ENROLLED
by Article VII, Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of
three dollars and fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to
offset a portion of administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and
forwarded to Capital Area Law Enforcement Foundation for the purchase of
special protective equipment, commonly known as a bulletproof vest, for peace
officers in the state of Louisiana.
F. The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.